Idaho statutes. Title 9 EVIDENCE
Chapter 6
PRODUCTION OF ALTERED WRITINGS

Sec.

§ 9-601. Explanation of alterations.

The party producing a writing as genuine which has been altered, or appears to have been altered, after its execution, in a part material to the question in dispute, must account for the appearance or alteration. He may show that the alteration was made by another without his concurrence, or was made with the consent of the parties affected by it, or otherwise properly or innocently made, or that the alteration did not change the meaning or language of the instrument. If he do [does] that he may give the writing in evidence, but not otherwise.